Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3554
Secretary of State; petition papers; requirements.

(1) The Secretary of State shall design the uniform petition papers to be distributed by all filing clerks for use in the recall of trustees of community improvement districts and shall keep a sufficient number of such blank petition papers on file for distribution to any filing clerk requesting recall petitions.

(2) Each petition paper presented to a qualified voter for his or her signature shall clearly indicate at the top (a) whether the trustee whose recall is being sought was elected solely by qualified resident voters, (b) whether the signatories must be qualified resident voters or may include qualified property owning voters, (c) that the signatories must support the holding of a recall election for the trustee, (d) the name of the individual sought to be recalled, and (e) a general statement of the reason or reasons for which recall is sought.

(3) Each petition paper shall contain a statement, entitled Instructions to Petition Circulators, prepared by the Secretary of State to assist circulators in understanding the provisions governing the petition process established by sections 18-3552 to 18-3559. The instructions shall include the following statement: No one circulating this petition paper in an attempt to gather signatures shall sign the circulator's affidavit unless each person who signed the petition paper did so in the presence of the circulator.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 54.
April 17, 2026